Utah statutes.
32B-4-603.   Carriers' records.

(1) (a)  A person, including a motor carrier, transporting an alcoholic product into or within this state shall make and maintain a record in which is entered, immediately on the receipt of an alcoholic product:

(i)  the name of every person to whom the alcoholic product is consigned;

(ii)  the amount and kind of alcoholic product received; and

(iii)  the date when the alcoholic product is delivered.

(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b)(ii), a consignee shall sign the consignee's name.

(ii)  If the consignee is a corporation, partnership, or limited liability company, an agent authorized in writing shall sign the record described in Subsection (1)(a).

(2)  A person described in Subsection (1) shall make the record open to inspection by an authorized official of the state or local authority at any time during the person's business hours.

(3)  A record under this section constitutes prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the record and is admissible as evidence in a court proceeding to enforce this title.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

